Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.105

Amendment to articles of incorporation—Approval of director—Procedure.

A credit union's articles of incorporation may be amended by the board with the approval of the director. Complete applications for amendments to the articles must be approved or denied by the director within sixty days of receipt. Amendments to a credit union's articles of incorporation must conform with RCW 31.12.055.

Upon approval, the director shall promptly deliver the articles' amendments, including any necessary filing fees paid by the applicant, to the secretary of state for filing. The articles' amendments are effective upon filing of the amendments by the secretary of state.

[ 2001 c 83 s 4; 1997 c 397 s 10; 1994 c 92 s 184; 1984 c 31 s 12.]